Maryland, session 2025, HB0718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section, the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.
(3) “MHPAEA” means the federal Mental Health Parity and Addiction
Equity Act.
(b) There is a Maryland Health Insurance Coverage Protection Commission.
(c) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) three members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President
of the Senate;
(2) three members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Health and Mental Hygiene, or the Secretary’s
designee;
(4) the Maryland Insurance Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s
designee;
(5) the Executive Director of the Health Services Cost Review Commission,
or the Executive Director’s designee;
(6) the Executive Director of the Maryland Health Benefit Exchange, or the
Executive Director’s designee;
(5) (7) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee; and
(6) (8) the following members:
(i) one representative of the Maryland Hospital Association,
designated by the President of the Association;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 696
(ii) one representative of a managed care organization, appointed
jointly by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House;
(iii) one consumer of health care services, appointed jointly by the
President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House;
(iv) one representative of a health insurance carrier, appointed
jointly by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House;
(v) one representative who is an employer, appointed by the
Governor;
(vi) one representative of the nursing home industry, appointed by
the Governor;
(vii) one representative of MedChi, designated by the Chief Executive
Officer of MedChi;
(viii) one representative of behavioral health providers, appointed
jointly by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House;
(ix) two members of the public:
1. one of whom shall be appointed jointly by the President of
the Senate and the Speaker of the House; and
2. one of whom shall be appointed by the Governor;
(x) one representative of a group model health maintenance
organization that participates in the individual market, appointed by the Governor; and
(xi) one representative of the League of Life and Health Insurers of
Maryland, designated by the President of the League;
(xii) one representative of the National Association of Insurance and
Financial Advisors, designated by the President of the Association; and
(xiii) one representative of the Maryland Association of Counties,
designated by the Association.
(d) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall designate a
member who is a Senator and a member who is a Delegate, respectively, to serve as cochairs
of the Commission.
(e) The Department of Legislative Services, the Maryland Department of Health,
and the Maryland Insurance Administration jointly shall provide staff for the Commission.
– 3 –

Ch. 696 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) (1) The Commission shall:
(i) monitor potential and actual federal changes to the ACA,
MHPAEA, Medicaid, the Maryland Children’s Health Program, Medicare, and the
Maryland All–Payer Model;
(ii) assess the impact of potential and actual federal changes to the
ACA, MHPAEA, Medicaid, the Maryland Children’s Health Program, Medicare, and the
Maryland All–Payer Model; and
(iii) provide recommendations for State and local action to protect
access of residents of the State to affordable health coverage.
(2) The duties of the Commission include:
(i) assessing the current and potential adverse effects of the loss of
health coverage on the residents, public health, and economy of the State resulting from
changes to the ACA, MHPAEA, Medicaid, the Maryland Children’s Health Program,
Medicare, or the Maryland All–Payer Model;
(ii) estimating the costs to the State and State residents of adverse
effects from potential and actual changes to the ACA, MHPAEA, Medicaid, the Maryland
Children’s Health Program, Medicare, or the Maryland All–Payer Model and the resulting
loss of health coverage;
(iii) examining measures that may prevent or mitigate the adverse
effects of potential and actual changes to the ACA, MHPAEA, Medicaid, the Maryland
Children’s Health Program, Medicare, or the Maryland All–Payer Model and the resulting
loss of health coverage on the residents, public health, and economy of the State;
(iv) making recommendations for laws that:
1. may be warranted to minimize the adverse effects
associated with potential and actual changes to the ACA, MHPAEA, Medicaid, the
Maryland Children’s Health Program, Medicare, or the Maryland All–Payer Model; and
2. will assist residents in obtaining and maintaining
affordable health coverage; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 696
(v) identifying potential funding sources for recommended laws, as
necessary.
(h) The Commission may:
(1) hold public meetings across the State to carry out the duties of the
Commission; and
(2) convene workgroups to solicit input from stakeholders.
(i) On or before December 31 each year, the Commission shall submit a report on
its findings and recommendations, including any legislative proposals, to the Governor and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2029, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –